California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(a) The purposes for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include all costs and estimated costs incidental to, or connected with, the accomplishment of those purposes, including, without limitation, engineering, inspection, legal, fiscal agents, financial consultant, and other fees, bond and other reserve funds, working capital, bond interest estimated to accrue during the construction period and for a period not to exceed three years thereafter, and expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(b) The estimated cost of accomplishing those purposes and the amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred.

(c) That the board intends to form an improvement district or districts of a portion or portions of the district which, in the opinion of
 the board, will be benefited, the exterior boundaries of which portion or portions are set forth on a map on file with the secretary of the district, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the proposed improvement district or districts, and to call an election in the proposed improvement district or districts on a date to be fixed for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district for the improvement district or districts.

(d) That taxes for the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon shall be levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the appropriate improvement district.

(e) The extent to which, if at all, all or a portion of the revenues of the district are to be used as provided in Section 30803 to pay the principal of, interest on, and sinking fund
 payments for the bonds, including the establishment and maintenance of any reserve fund therefor.

(f) That a general description of the proposed improvement, together with a map showing the exterior boundaries of the proposed improvement district or districts with relation to the territory immediately contiguous thereto and to the proposed improvement, is on file with the secretary of the district and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested.

(g) The time and place for a hearing by the board on the questions of the formation of the proposed improvement district or districts, the extent thereof, the proposed improvement, the estimated cost, and the amount of debt to be incurred.

(h) That, at the time and place specified in the resolution, any person interested, including all persons owning
 property in the district or in the proposed improvement district or districts, will be heard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

30961.

Notice of said hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution declaring the necessity pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code prior to the time fixed for the hearing in at least one newspaper published in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30962.

At the time and place so fixed, or at any time and place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing. At the hearing, any person interested, including any person owning property within the district or within the proposed improvement district or districts, may appear and present any matters material to the questions set forth in the resolution declaring the necessity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

30963.

The board may change the purposes for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, or the estimated cost, or the amount of bonded debt to be incurred, or the boundaries of the proposed improvement district or districts, or one or all of those matters. However, the board shall not change the boundaries so as to include any territory which will not, in its judgment, be benefited by the improvement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

30964.

The purposes, estimated cost, amount of bonded debt, or boundaries shall not be changed by the board except after notice of its intention to do so, given by publication pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in at least one newspaper published in the district. The notice shall state the changed purposes and the estimated cost and debt proposed and that the exterior boundaries as proposed to be changed are set forth on a map on file with the secretary of the district, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the proposed improvement district or districts, and specify the time and place for hearing on the change or changes,
 which time shall be at least 10 days after the publication of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

30965.

At the time and place so fixed, or at any time and place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing. At the hearing, any person interested, including any person owning property within the district or the proposed improvement district or districts, may appear and present any matters material to the changes stated in the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

30966.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall, by resolution, determine whether it is deemed necessary to incur the bonded indebtedness, and, if so, the resolution shall also state the purposes for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, the estimated cost of accomplishing those purposes, the amount of the proposed debt, that the exterior boundaries of the portion or portions of the district which will be benefited are set forth on a map on file with the secretary of the district, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the improvement district or districts, and that each portion or portions of the district set forth on the
 map shall thereupon constitute and be known as “Improvement District No. ____ of the Southern California Rapid Transit District,” and the determinations made in the resolution shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

30967.

After the formation of the improvement district or districts within the district pursuant to this article, all proceedings for the authorization and issuance of bonds of the district for the improvement district or districts shall be limited and shall apply only to the improvement district or districts; and taxes for the payment of those bonds and the interest thereon shall be levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the improvement district or districts; and the revenues of the district shall be used only to the extent set forth in the resolution declaring the necessity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

30968.

After the board has made its determination of the matters required to be determined by resolution pursuant to Section 30966, and if the board deems it necessary to incur the bonded indebtedness, the board shall, by a further resolution, call a special election in the improvement district or districts for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district for the improvement district or districts. The resolution shall state all of the following:

(a) That the board deems it necessary to incur the
 bonded indebtedness.

(b) The purposes for which the bonded indebtedness will be incurred.

(c) The estimated cost of accomplishing those purposes.

(d) The amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred.

(e) The improvement district or districts to be benefited by those indebtedness, as set forth in the resolution making determinations, and that a map showing the exterior boundaries of the improvement district or districts is on file with the secretary of the district, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the improvement district or districts.

(f) That taxes for the payment of those bonds and the interest thereon shall be levied exclusively upon the taxable
 property in the improvement district or districts; and that revenues of the district shall be used only to the extent set forth in the resolution declaring the necessity.

(g) The maximum term the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before maturity, which shall not exceed 50 years from the date thereof or the date of each series thereof.

(h) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed the maximum rate allowed by law.

(i) The proposition to be submitted to the voters which may include one or more purposes.

(j) The date of the election.

(k) The manner of holding the election and the procedure for voting for and against the measure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

30969.

Thereafter the provisions relating to the authorization and issuance of bonds, Sections 30901 to 30914, inclusive, shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1215.)
-------------------------------------------

30970.

Any action or proceeding, wherein the validity of the formation of the improvement district or districts or of any bonds or of the proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned, or denied, shall be commenced within three months from the date of the election; otherwise, the bonds and all proceedings in relation thereto, including the formation of the improvement district or districts, is valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous [30980. - 30982.]

30980.

The district may bring an action to determine the validity of any of its bonds, equipment trust certificates, warrants, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 187.)
-------------------------------------------

30981.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part or any other law, the provisions of all ordinances, resolutions and other proceedings in the issuance by the district of any bonds, bonds with a pledge of revenues, bonds for improvement districts, revenue bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes, or any and all evidences of indebtedness or liability shall constitute a contract between the district and the holders of such bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes or evidences of indebtedness or liability and the provisions thereof shall be enforceable against the district, any or all of its successors or assigns, the state, any department of the state, or any officer
 thereof, by mandamus or any other appropriate suit, action or proceeding in law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction. Nothing contained in this part or in any other law shall be held to relieve the district or the territory included within it from any bonded or other debt or liability contracted by the district. Upon dissolution of the district or upon withdrawal of territory therefrom, the property formerly included within the district or withdrawn therefrom shall continue to be liable for the payment of all bonded and other indebtedness or liabilities outstanding at the time of such dissolution or withdrawal the same as if the district had not been so dissolved or the territory withdrawn therefrom, and it shall be the duty of the state or other successors or assigns to provide for the payment of such bonded and other indebtedness and liabilities. Except as may be otherwise provided in the proceedings for the authorization, issuance and sale of any revenue bonds, bonds secured by a pledge of
 revenues or bonds for improvement districts secured by a pledge of revenues, revenues of any kind or nature derived from any revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities or property owned, operated or controlled by the district shall be pledged, charged, assigned and have a lien thereon for the payment of such bonds as long as the same are outstanding, regardless of any change in ownership, operation or control of such revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities or property and it shall, in such later event or events, be the duty of the state or other successors or assigns to continue to maintain and operate such revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities or property as long as bonds are outstanding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1215.)
-------------------------------------------

30982.

All bonds and other evidences of indebtedness issued by the district under the provisions of this part, and the interest thereon, are free and exempt from all taxation within the State of California, except for transfer, franchise, inheritance and estate taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Provisions Relating to the Los Angeles Metropolitan Transit Authority [31000. - 31005.]

31000.

On the date (which is hereinafter referred to as “merger date”) of the second regular meeting of the board held pursuant to Section 30251 that follows the meeting referred to in Section 30227 the Los Angeles Metropolitan Transit Authority (herein sometimes referred to as “authority”) shall be merged into the district. Such merger shall be effective upon the recording with the Recorder of the County of Los Angeles of the certificate provided for in Section 31001.

Upon such merger the separate existence of the authority ceases, and the district shall succeed, ipso facto and by operation of law and without other transfer, to all the
 rights and property of the authority, and shall be subject to all the legally enforceable debts and liabilities of the authority, in the same manner as if the district had itself incurred them.

All rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of the authority shall be preserved unimpaired, limited in lien to the property affected by such liens immediately prior to the time of the merger.

Any action or proceeding pending by or against the authority may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the district, or the district may be proceeded against or substituted in its place.

For the protection of the holders of the outstanding, unmatured bonds and other evidences of indebtedness of the authority the district shall have power to take all actions and do all things necessary or required for the protection of such holders and for compliance with the terms of such bonds and
 other evidences of indebtedness; and the district shall have power to continue all services which the authority is furnishing on the merger date whether such buslines and services are partly or wholly within or without the district, or within or without the County of Los Angeles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31001.

Upon the merger date, the secretary of the district shall record in the office of the Recorder of the County of Los Angeles a certificate setting forth the date upon which the Southern California Rapid Transit Law became effective and stating that the district was created by such law and that by virtue of Section 31000 thereof the district succeeded on the merger date, without other transfer, to all the rights and property of the authority subject to all the legally enforceable debts and liabilities of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31002.

A copy of the certificate provided for in Section 31001 certified by the Recorder of the County of Los Angeles is, except as against the State, conclusive evidence of the transfer to the district of all the rights and property of the authority subject to all the legally enforceable debts and liabilities of the authority, all as provided in Section 31000 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31003.

On said merger date, all employees of the authority shall become employees of the district with all the same rights, privileges and compensation they had as employees of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31004.

It is the intent of this part that the board of directors of the district shall have a free choice as to officers of the district mentioned in Section 30300 who are not members of the board of directors. At the merger date such officers shall be appointed on a permanent or pro tem basis, in the discretion of the board. Prior to that time, however, the following shall serve as ex officio officers of the district:

Secretary—the Clerk of the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles. 

General Manager—the Chief Administrative Officer of the County of Los Angeles. 

General Counsel—the County Counsel of the County of Los Angeles.

Treasurer—the Treasurer of the County of Los Angeles.

Auditor—the Auditor of the County of Los Angeles.

The Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles is authorized and directed to make available to the district its hearing room and other space, personnel and facilities so that the district can be organized and the transfer of operations be completed in an orderly businesslike manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31005.

Whenever the board deems it necessary, it may issue bonds to refund all outstanding, unmatured bonds of the authority which are subject to call and redemption prior to maturity. The amount of such bonds shall include the principal and, if necessary, the interest of the bonds to be refunded, the premiums payable upon call and redemption thereof and all expenses of the trustee for the refunding, the calling of said bonds for redemption and any other incidental expenses. The refunding bonds shall be authorized and issued in the manner provided for herein as a separate issue or as a part of another issue for any purpose authorized in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Annexation and Exclusion [31400. - 31413.]

31400.

The governing body of any city, which is not within the district, may apply to the board of directors of the district for consent to annex the corporate area of such city to the district. The board of supervisors of the County of Los Angeles and any other county may apply to the board of directors of the district for consent to annex any unincorporated county territory to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31401.

The board of directors may grant or deny such application and in granting the same may fix the terms and conditions upon which the corporate area of city or unincorporated county territory may be annexed to and become a part of the district. Such terms and conditions may provide, among other things, without limitation, (a) for the levy by the district of special taxes upon taxable property within such city or such unincorporated county territory in addition to the taxes elsewhere in this part authorized to be levied by the district, and in case such terms and conditions shall provide for the levy of such special taxes, the board of directors in fixing
 such terms and conditions shall specify the aggregate amount to be so raised and the number of years prescribed for raising such aggregate sum, and that substantially equal annual levies will be made for the purpose of raising such sum over the period so prescribed, and (b) representation of the city or unincorporated county territory, as the case may be, on the board or in an advisory capacity to the board; provided, however, that the membership of the board and the appointment thereof shall not be changed unless the terms and conditions are approved by a unanimous vote of all members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31402.

The action of the board of directors evidenced by resolution shall be promptly transmitted to the governing body of such applying city or board of supervisors, and if such action shall grant consent to such annexation, such governing body or board of supervisors may thereupon submit to the qualified electors of such city or the unincorporated county territory, at any general or special election held therein, the proposition of such annexation subject to the terms and conditions fixed as herein provided. Notice of such election shall be given by posting at least 10 days and in three public places in the unincorporated county territory and by publication once at least 10 days
 before the date fixed for the election in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county or in the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31403.

The notice shall contain the substance of the terms and conditions fixed by the board of directors, as provided in Section 31401. Such election shall be conducted and the returns thereof canvassed in the manner provided by law for elections in such city or county as the case may be. If the proposition shall receive the affirmative vote of a majority of electors voting thereon at such election, the governing body of such city or the board of supervisors of the county shall certify the result of such election on the proposition to the board of directors of the district, together with a legal description of the boundaries of the corporate area of such city as of the date of
 the election, or the boundaries of such unincorporated county territory, accompanied by a map or plat indicating such boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31404.

A certificate of proceedings shall be made by the secretary of the district and filed with the Secretary of State. Upon the filing thereof in the office of the Secretary of State, the corporate area of such city as of the date of the election or such unincorporated county territory shall become, and be, an integral part of the district, and the taxable property therein shall be subject to taxation thereafter for all purposes of the district, including, without limitation, the payment of bonds and other obligations of the district at the time authorized or outstanding, and the board of directors of the district shall be empowered to do all things necessary to enforce and
 make effective the terms and conditions of annexation fixed as hereinabove authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31405.

Upon the filing in his or her office of the certificate of proceedings, the Secretary of State shall, within 10 days, issue a certificate, reciting the filing of those papers in his or her office and the annexation of the corporate area of the city as of the date of the election or the unincorporated county territory to the district. The Secretary of State shall transmit the original of the certificate to the secretary of the district and shall forward a certified copy thereof to the county elections official of each county in which the district or any
 portion thereof is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 105.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31407.

If territory is annexed to a city or consolidated with a city, the corporate area of which has been included in the district, or, if a new city is incorporated, a portion of which is within the district, such annexed, consolidated, or incorporated territory as is not already within the district shall simultaneously with its annexation to the city or consolidation with a city or its incorporation as a city be annexed to the district, and shall become and be, an integral part of the district and the taxable property therein shall be subject to taxation thereafter for all purposes of the district, including, without limitation, the payment of bonds and other obligations of the
 district at the time authorized and outstanding, and the board of directors of the district shall be empowered to do all things necessary to enforce and make effective this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31408.

If the applicable provisions of law governing such annexation to, or consolidation with, such municipality or such incorporation shall require any notice of any election called for the purpose of determining whether such proposed annexation, consolidation or incorporation shall occur, or shall require any notice of hearing or other notice to be given to the residents or electors of, or owners of property in, such territory, such notice shall contain a statement that the territory shall be annexed to the district, and shall become and be an integral part of the district and the taxable property therein shall be subject to taxation thereafter for all purposes of the district,
 including, without limitation, the payment of bonds and other obligations of the district at the time authorized and outstanding. The governing body of such city or other officer thereof having the duty of certifying the proceedings resulting in such annexation to, or consolidation with, such city, or such incorporation of, pursuant to the provisions of law applicable thereto, shall include in such certification a record of the proceedings by which such territory has been annexed to the district in accordance with the provisions of this article, and shall file a duplicate of such certificate with the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31409.

The validity of any proceedings resulting in the annexation of territory to the district shall not be contested in any action unless such action shall have been brought within three months after the completion of such annexation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31410.

If any portion of the corporate area of any city whose corporate area is a part of the district, shall be excluded from such city in accordance with the provisions of law applicable to such exclusions, and, if such area is not within the boundaries of the district as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30100) of this part, or, if in another county is not surrounded by territory which is a part of the district, then such excluded area shall thereby be excluded from and shall no longer be a part of the district, but the taxable property within such excluded area shall continue taxable pursuant to Section 30981.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31411.

Any city whose corporate area is a part of the district and any county with regard to any unincorporated territory which is a part of the district, may apply to the board of directors of the district for consent to exclude the area from the district. The board of directors may grant or deny the application and in granting the same may fix the terms and conditions upon which a corporate area of the city or the unincorporated county territory may be excluded from the district. The terms and conditions shall include, without limitation, exclusion of the city or
 unincorporated county territory, as the case may be, from representation on the board or in an advisory capacity to the board. The action of the board of directors evidenced by resolution shall be promptly transmitted to the governing body of the applying city or board of supervisors and if the action shall grant consent to the exclusion the governing body of the city or the board or supervisors of the county, as the case may be, may submit to the electors of the city or the unincorporated county territory at any general or special election the proposition of excluding from the district the corporate area of the city or the unincorporated county territory. Notice of the election shall be given in the manner provided in Section 31402. The election shall be conducted and the returns thereof canvassed in the manner provided by law for the conduct of elections in the city or county. In the event that the majority of the electors voting thereon vote in the favor of the withdrawal, the result thereof shall be
 certified by the governing body of the city or the board of supervisors of the county to the board of directors of the district. A certificate of the proceedings hereunder shall be made by the secretary of the district and filed with the Secretary of State, and upon the filing of the certificate the corporate area of the city or the unincorporated county territory shall be excluded from the district, and shall no longer be a part thereof; provided, however, that the property within the city as the city shall exist at the time of the exclusion, or within the unincorporated county territory shall continue taxable pursuant to Section 30981. Upon the filing in his or her office of the certificate of proceedings the Secretary of State shall, within 10 days, issue a certificate, reciting the filing of the papers in his or her office and the exclusion of the corporate area of the city or the unincorporated county territory from the district. The Secretary of State shall transmit the original of his or her
 certificate to the secretary of the district and shall forward a certified copy thereof to the county elections official of each county in which the district or any portion thereof is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 106.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31412.

Whenever any change is made in the boundaries of this district by the annexation or exclusion of any city or any unincorporated county territory pursuant to this chapter, the district shall comply with the provisions of Sections 54900, 54901, and 54902 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

31413.

No consent to annexation or exclusion shall be made by the board of directors of the district pursuant to this chapter, and no annexation or exclusion shall be made pursuant to this part or pursuant to any other law, which is in violation of all or any part of any ordinance, resolution or other proceeding taken by the district in the issuance of bonds, certificates, notes or any and all other evidences of indebtedness or liability of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Severability [31520. - 31520.]

31520.

If any section, subsection, sentence, clause, or phrase of this part, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is for any reason held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this part, or the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this part, and each section, subsection, sentence, clause, and phrase thereof, irrespective of the fact that one or more sections, subsections, sentences, clauses or phrases, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, be held invalid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Preferential Facilities for High-Occupancy Vehicles [32000. - 32000.]

32000.

In cooperation with the Department of Transportation and the cities, counties, and local and regional transportation entities in the district’s service area, the district, after public hearings, shall prepare, and submit to the Legislature by March 31, 1974, a comprehensive plan for the development and operation of preferential facilities for high-occupancy vehicles in its service area.

As used in this section, “preferential facilities” shall include, but not be limited to, freeway lanes, freeway ramps, street lanes, transit terminals, and parking facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1175.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Special Benefit Assessment Districts [33000. - 33021.]

33000.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a) It is necessary and in the best interest of the citizens of the state to authorize the Southern California Rapid Transit District to levy special benefit assessments for needed public rail rapid transit facilities and services on the property which benefits from those facilities and services.

(b) The rail rapid transit facilities and services provide special benefits to parcels of land, and improvements thereon, in the vicinity of rail rapid transit stations, and provide general
 benefits to the community at large. The Board of Directors of the Southern California Rapid Transit District shall be the conclusive judge of the proportion of special and general benefits produced by the facilities and of the distribution of the special benefits among parcels of property within the benefit assessment district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33001.

(a) Whenever the board finds that property adjacent to, or in the vicinity of, one or more rail transit stations, or proposed rail transit stations, of the district receives or will receive special benefit by reason of the location or operation of one or more of those rail transit stations, the board may, by resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of its members, provide for notice and hearing on its intention to establish one or more special benefit districts and to levy a special benefit assessment on real property therein for the purpose of financing, in whole or in part, the acquisition, construction, development, joint
 development, operation, maintenance, or repair of one or more rail transit stations and rail transit related facilities located within the benefit district. 

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “benefit district” means a special benefit assessment district established pursuant to this chapter, the area of which shall not lie more than one mile from the center point of any rail transit station or proposed rail transit station within the central business district of the City of Los Angeles and shall not lie more than one-half mile from the center point of any rail transit station or proposed rail transit station at any other location. “Central business district of the City of Los Angeles” means that area within the City of Los Angeles lying east of the Harbor Freeway (State Highway Route 11).

(c) The resolution may provide that the proposed benefit district will contain separate
 zones, which may consist of either contiguous or noncontiguous areas of land within the district. The proposed benefit district and each proposed zone, if any, therein shall be an area adjacent to, or in the vicinity of, one or more rail transit stations or proposed rail transit stations. The boundaries of the benefit district and of each zone, if any, therein shall be drawn so as to reflect, as accurately as possible, the areas in which special benefits are conferred by reason of the proximity and operation of one or more rail transit stations.

(d) The notice stating the time and place of the hearing, and setting forth the boundaries and purpose of the proposed benefit district, shall be published prior to the time fixed for the hearing pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(e) Notice shall also be mailed at least 30 days prior to the hearing to all owners of real
 property within the boundaries of the proposed benefit district whose names and addresses appear on the last equalized assessment roll or are otherwise known to the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles or to the district.

(f) For purposes of this chapter, “transit related facilities” means land, buildings and equipment or any interest therein, whether or not the operation thereof produces revenue, which has, as its primary purpose, the operation of the rail transit system or the providing of services to the passengers of the rail transit system, but does not mean any land, buildings, or equipment, or interest therein, which is used primarily for the production of revenue not arising from the operation of the rail transit system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33001.5.

(a) At the time and place fixed for the hearing on the establishment of the benefit district, or at any time and place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing. At the hearing, interested persons may appear and present matters material to the proposed board action. At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall, by a resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of its members, determine whether to proceed with the proposed action.

The resolution shall state, as appropriate, the maximum and minimum rate of assessment, the amount of the special benefit
 assessment and the purposes for which it is to be levied, the estimated cost of accomplishing the purposes, and the dates or approximate intervals at which the assessment shall be levied. The resolution shall also state that the exterior boundaries of the benefit district are set forth on a map on file with the secretary of the district, which map shall govern for all purposes as to the extent of the benefit district and zones, if any, therein and that the area set forth on the map shall thereupon constitute and be known as “Benefit District No. __ of the Southern California Rapid Transit District,” or as “Benefit Zone __ of the Benefit District No. __ of the Southern California Rapid Transit District,” as designated by the board.

(b) The resolution shall be submitted to the governing body. The governing body shall, after a public hearing conducted by the governing body and prior to the creation of the benefit district, approve, or amend and
 approve, as amended, or disapprove the geographic boundaries of the benefit district and the method of assessment. The resolution of approval or disapproval from the governing body shall be returned to the board.

(c) The board shall, by a two-thirds vote of its members, determine whether to create the benefit district as approved by the governing body. If the board decides to proceed with creating the benefit district as approved by the governing body, the board may, in addition to any amendments made by the governing body, reduce the size of the benefit district, but in so doing shall not include any territory not included in the benefit district approved by the governing body nor change the approved method of assessment. The determination by the board is final and conclusive.

(d) For purposes of this section, “governing body” means the city council of a city in which the
 proposed benefit district is located or, if the benefit district is located in unincorporated territory, the board of supervisors of the county in which the proposed benefit district is located.
